Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3602
Registration; required, when; signature requirements; registration, contents; renewal; term.

(1) Before conducting home inspections in this state, a home inspector shall register with the Secretary of State. If the home inspector is an individual, the home inspector shall sign such registration. If the home inspector is a firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, limited liability company, or other legal entity, an officer or agent of the home inspector shall sign such registration. Such registration shall include:

(a) The name of the home inspector if the home inspector is an individual or the name of the legal entity under which such home inspector proposes to register and transact business in this state;

(b) The address of the home office of the home inspector;

(c) The name and address of the agent for service of process on the home inspector; and

(d) Any national certification relating to home inspection currently held by the home inspector.

(2) A home inspector may apply to renew a registration by submitting an application for renewal in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State within forty-five days prior to the expiration of the registration.

(3) A registration for a home inspector is valid for two years.

Laws 2021, LB423, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 29.